Massachusetts, session 194th, S95.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (a1/2) of section 4 of chapter 94G of the General Laws is hereby
amended by striking clause (xxvi) and inserting in place thereof the following:
(xxvi) requirements for the labeling of a package containing marijuana or marijuana
products that shall, at a minimum, include: (1) a symbol or easily recognizable mark issued by
the commission that indicates the package contains marijuana or a marijuana product; (2) a
symbol or other easily recognizable mark issued by the commission on the package indicating to
children that the product is harmful to children; (3) the name and contact information of the
marijuana cultivator or the marijuana product manufacturer who produced the marijuana or
marijuana product; (4) the results of sampling, testing and analysis conducted by a licensed
independent testing laboratory; (5) a seal certifying the marijuana meets such testing standards;
of 2

(6) a unique batch number identifying the production batch associated with manufacturing,
processing, and cultivating; (7) a list of ingredients and possible allergens; (8) in bold, the
amount of delta-nine-tetrahydrocannabinol (Δ9–THC) in the package and in each serving of a
marijuana product as expressed in absolute terms and as a percentage of volume; (9) the number
of servings in a package if there are multiple servings; (10) a use-by date, if applicable; and (11)
the following statement, including capitalization: ''This product has not been analyzed or
approved by the FDA. There is limited information on the side effects of using this product, and
there may be associated health risks. Marijuana use during pregnancy and breast-feeding may
pose potential harms. It is against the law to drive or operate machinery when under the
influence of this product. KEEP THIS PRODUCT AWAY FROM CHILDREN.''; and (12)
comprehensive prominent rotating health warnings, based on the best available research on what
constitutes effective warnings for transmitting knowledge and achieving behavior change from
tobacco and cannabis warning research, including pictorial warnings if supported. These
regulations shall be periodically updated based on emerging science on cannabis and on warning
communication best practices. These warnings must also include the increased risk of psychosis,
schizophrenia, and suicide with use of THC-containing marijuana products, especially when
initiated young or used frequently.
of 2